Hawaii statutes.
[§277-1] Findings and declaration of
necessity. The legislature finds and declares that:

(1) There is a critical problem in establishing
convenient and economical means for transporting fuels and other sources of
energy from the places of manufacture or storage to distribution areas within
the State of Hawaii or the places of consumption;

(2) There would be a maximization of the use of
available lands if a state agency were to be authorized to acquire, hold and
manage energy corridors consisting of lands or interest therein, thereby
controlling the use thereof;

(3) Competition would be fostered and thereby a
reduction in cost to consumers would be realized if the State could make
available energy corridors as the location for the facilities necessary for the
transportation of sources of energy;

(4) The department of transportation is the agency of
the State best able to manage and control the energy corridors. The
legislature also finds that the acquisition of private property for the
aforementioned purposes is necessary, and that such acquisition is for a public
use. [L 1970, c 33, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next